Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 1 Commander in Chief and Staff

38-2-110.
Governor as militia commander in chief; issuance and effect of regulations.

The Governor shall be the commander in chief of the militia of the state. The Governor is authorized to issue regulations for the government of the militia. Regulations issued by the Governor shall have the same force and effect as this chapter, but they shall conform to the laws and regulations of the United States relating to the organization, discipline, and training of the militia; to this chapter; and, as nearly as practicable, to the laws and regulations governing the army, navy, and air force of the United States. The rules and regulations in force on February 2, 1955, not inconsistent with this chapter, shall remain in force until new rules and regulations are approved and promulgated.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 86-101, 86-102; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 4; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 5.

Cross references.

Commander in chief, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. V, Sec. II, Para. III.

38-2-111.
Personal aides-de-camp; appointment; commissions; length of service; duties.

The Governor’s personal staff shall consist of one chief of aides-de-camp, with rank of brigadier general; two assistant chiefs of aides-de-camp, with rank of colonel; all other aides-de-camp shall be appointed with the rank of lieutenant colonel. The selection of aides-de-camp shall be without regard to previous military service, sex, or age limit; and the commissions of all of these officers shall expire with the expiration of the term of the Governor making the appointment. All appointments will be in either the army or air force. Officers of the National Guard shall be eligible to appointment to any of the ranks or the offices of aide-de-camp provided for, but such appointments shall not vacate or affect their status as commissioned officers in the National Guard in which they are serving. The aides-de-camp shall perform such personal and ceremonial duties pertaining to their office as may be required of them by the Governor.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 1; Ga. L. 1921, p. 195, § 1; Ga. L. 1931, p. 198, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 86-103, 86-104; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 4; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 12; Ga. L. 1963, p. 10, § 1.

38-2-112.
Naval advisor and aide-de-camp; requirements; length of service.

The Governor shall appoint a naval advisor and aide-de-camp, with the rank of captain. No person shall be eligible to hold the office of naval advisor unless he has held a commission in the United States naval service of the rank of lieutenant commander or above and has served not less than two years therein. The naval advisor shall perform such services and duties as the Governor may require, and his commission shall expire with the expiration of the term of the Governor making the appointment.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 1; Ga. L. 1921, p. 195, § 1; Ga. L. 1931, p. 198, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 86-103, 86-104; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 26; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 13.